praksid/praks5/praks5_jätkud.lexc
LEXICON tüüp_vidin
  +Sg+Nom: # ;
         :a 2C; 

LEXICON 2C
         : sg_gen_jt ; 
  +Sg+Par:%>t # ;
  +Pl+Gen:%>te # ;
      +Pl:%>te semkäänded ;
  +Pl+Par:%>id # ;


LEXICON sg_gen_jt

        +Sg+Gen: # ;
            +Sg: semkäänded ;
        +Pl+Nom:%>d # ;

LEXICON semkäänded

    +Ill:%>sse # ;
    +Ine:%>s # ;
    +Ela:%>st # ;
    +All:%>le # ;
    +Ade:%>l # ;
    +Abl:%>lt # ;
    +Tra:%>ks # ;
    +Ter:%>ni # ;
    +Ess:%>na # ;
    +Abe:%>ta # ;
    +Kom:%>ga # ;
